Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6673XS (2) 91 nls/ko S.F. 2247 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 15.106F Program participation ââ 1 public assistance prohibition. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âProgramâ means any program administered by the authority 4 pursuant to subchapter II. 5 b. âPublic assistanceâ means the same as defined in section 6 239.1. 7 2. If any employee of a person receives public assistance on 8 the date that the person applies to a program, the authority 9 shall reject the personâs application and prohibit the person 10 from participating in the program. 11